Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-258
Partnership agreement; classes or groups of general partners; voting rights specified.

(a) A partnership agreement may provide for classes or groups of general partners having such relative rights, powers, and duties as provided in the partnership agreement and may make provision for the future creation in the manner provided in the partnership agreement of additional classes or groups of general partners having such relative rights, powers, and duties as may from time to time be established, including rights, powers, and duties senior to existing classes or groups of general partners. A partnership agreement may provide for the taking of an action, including the amendment of the partnership agreement, without the vote or approval of any general partner or class or group of general partners, including an action to create under the provisions of the partnership agreement a class or group of partnership interests that was not previously outstanding.

(b) The partnership agreement may grant to all or certain identified general partners or a specified class or group of the general partners the right to vote, on a per capita or any other basis, separately or with all or any class or group of the limited partners or the general partners, on any matter.

(c) A partnership agreement which grants a right to vote to any class or group of general partners may set forth provisions relating to notice of the time, place, or purpose of any meeting at which any matter is to be voted on by any general partners, waiver of any such notice, action by consent without a meeting, the establishment of a record date, quorum requirements, voting in person or by proxy, or any other matter with respect to the exercise of any such right to vote.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 26;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 33.